Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1435
Rules and regulations.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 85-1430 to 85-1435.

Laws 2026, LB956, § 6.
July 1, 2026